Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,130
Surrender of charter upon domestication.

(MBCA 9.23) (a) Whenever a domestic business corporation has adopted and approved, in the manner required by sections 21-2,127 to 21-2,132, a plan of domestication providing for the corporation to be domesticated in a foreign jurisdiction, articles of charter surrender shall be signed on behalf of the corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles of charter surrender shall set forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) A statement that the articles of charter surrender are being filed in connection with the domestication of the corporation in a foreign jurisdiction;

(3) A statement that the domestication was duly approved by the shareholders and, if voting by any separate voting group was required, by each such separate voting group, in the manner required by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act and the articles of incorporation; and

(4) The corporation's new jurisdiction of incorporation.

(b) The articles of charter surrender shall be delivered by the corporation to the Secretary of State for filing. The articles of charter surrender shall take effect at the effective time provided in section 21-206. Within ten business days after the articles of charter surrender take effect, a domestic business corporation becoming domesticated in a foreign jurisdiction shall send written notice of charter surrender to the last-known address of any holder of a security interest in collateral of such domestic business corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 130;

Laws 2017, LB99, § 2.